Nebraska, session 109, LB483.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 2, Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, is amended to
read:
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act:
(1) (1)(a) Allowable amount of cannabis means permissible cannabis
products containing up to three hundred milligrams of delta-9 THC; five
ounces of cannabis.
(b) Allowable amount of cannabis does not include the weight of any
other ingredient combined with cannabis as part of topical or oral
administrations, food, drink, or other preparations;
(2)(a) Cannabis means all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis
whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any
part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin.
(b) Cannabis includes marijuana, hashish, and concentrated cannabis.
(b) (c) Cannabis does not include hemp, as defined in Section
2-503(13) of the Nebraska Hemp Farming Act, nor does it include the
mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil or cake
made from the seeds of the plant, the sterilized seed of the plant which
is incapable of germination, or cannabidiol contained in a drug product
approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration. ;
(c) Cannabis does not include hemp as defined in section 2-503;
(3) Cannabis accessories means any equipment, products, or materials
of any kind that are used, intended for use, or designed for use in
storing , vaporizing, or containing permissible cannabis products , or
for ingesting , inhaling, or otherwise introducing permissible cannabis
products into the human body;
(4) Caregiver means:
(a) In the case of a qualified patient who is eighteen years of age
or older and is not under the protection of a legal guardian, a person
who:
-2-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(i) Is at least twenty-one years of age; and
(ii) Has been designated by a qualified patient in a signed
affidavit;
(b) In the case of a qualified patient who is younger than eighteen
years of age or a qualified patient under the protection of a legal
guardian:
(i) The legal guardian or parent with authority to make health care
decisions of the qualified patient; or
(ii) A person designated in a sworn affidavit by the legal guardian
or parent with authority to make health care decisions; or
(c) A health care facility as defined in section 71-413 or a home
health agency as defined in section 71-417, if the facility or agency has
been designated by a qualified patient or the legal guardian or parent
with authority to make health care decisions of a qualified patient in a
sworn affidavit and if the facility or agency has agreed in writing to
serve as a caregiver for the qualified patient;
(5) Health care practitioner means a physician, an osteopathic
physician, a physician assistant, or a nurse practitioner who:
(a) Practices in Nebraska; and
(b) Is licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act or who is
licensed in any state and practicing in compliance with the Uniform
Credentialing Act;
(6) Permissible cannabis product means cannabis in the form of a
pill or liquid tincture;
(7) (6) Qualified patient means:
(a) An individual eighteen years of age or older with a written
recommendation from a health care practitioner; or
(b) An individual younger than eighteen years of age with a written
recommendation from a health care practitioner and with the written
permission of a legal guardian or parent with authority to make health
care decisions for the individual; and
-3-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(8) THC means tetrahydrocannabinol; and
(9) (7) Written recommendation means a valid signed and dated
declaration from a health care practitioner stating that, in the health
care practitioner's professional judgment, the potential benefits of
cannabis outweigh the potential harms for the alleviation of a patient's
medical condition, its symptoms, or side effects of the condition's
treatment. A written recommendation is valid for two years after the date
of issuance or for a period of time specified by the health care
practitioner on the written recommendation.
Sec. 2. Section 28-416, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-416 (1) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act, or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, it shall be unlawful for any
person knowingly or intentionally: (a) To manufacture, distribute,
deliver, dispense, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute,
deliver, or dispense a controlled substance; or (b) to create,
distribute, or possess with intent to distribute a counterfeit controlled
substance.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (4), (5), (7), (8), (9), and
(10) of this section, any person who violates subsection (1) of this
section with respect to: (a) A controlled substance classified in
Schedule I, II, or III of section 28-405 which is an exceptionally
hazardous drug shall be guilty of a Class II felony; (b) any other
controlled substance classified in Schedule I, II, or III of section
28-405 shall be guilty of a Class IIA felony; or (c) a controlled
substance classified in Schedule IV or V of section 28-405 shall be
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(3) A person knowingly or intentionally possessing a controlled
substance, except marijuana or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
-4-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of Schedule I of section 28-405, unless
such substance was obtained directly or pursuant to a medical order
issued by a practitioner authorized to prescribe while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by the act, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony. A person
shall not be in violation of this subsection if section 28-472 or 28-1701
applies.
(4)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, any person eighteen years of age or older who knowingly or
intentionally manufactures, distributes, delivers, dispenses, or
possesses with intent to manufacture, distribute, deliver, or dispense a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance (i) to a
person under the age of eighteen years, (ii) in, on, or within one
thousand feet of the real property comprising a public or private
elementary, vocational, or secondary school, a community college, a
public or private college, junior college, or university, or a
playground, or (iii) within one hundred feet of a public or private youth
center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility shall be punished
by the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section, depending upon
the controlled substance involved, for the first violation and for a
second or subsequent violation shall be punished by the next higher
penalty classification than that prescribed for a first violation of this
subsection, but in no event shall such person be punished by a penalty
greater than a Class IB felony.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Playground means any outdoor facility, including any parking lot
appurtenant to the facility, intended for recreation, open to the public,
and with any portion containing three or more apparatus intended for the
recreation of children, including sliding boards, swingsets, and
teeterboards;
-5-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(ii) Video arcade facility means any facility legally accessible to
persons under eighteen years of age, intended primarily for the use of
pinball and video machines for amusement, and containing a minimum of ten
pinball or video machines; and
(iii) Youth center means any recreational facility or gymnasium,
including any parking lot appurtenant to the facility or gymnasium,
intended primarily for use by persons under eighteen years of age which
regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities.
(5)(a) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older
to knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to manufacture, transport, distribute, carry, deliver, dispense,
prepare for delivery, offer for delivery, or possess with intent to do
the same a controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(b) Except as authorized by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,
it shall be unlawful for any person eighteen years of age or older to
knowingly and intentionally employ, hire, use, cause, persuade, coax,
induce, entice, seduce, or coerce any person under the age of eighteen
years to aid and abet any person in the manufacture, transportation,
distribution, carrying, delivery, dispensing, preparation for delivery,
offering for delivery, or possession with intent to do the same of a
controlled substance or a counterfeit controlled substance.
(c) Any person who violates subdivision (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall be punished by the next higher penalty classification
than the penalty prescribed in subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of
this section, depending upon the controlled substance involved, for the
first violation and for a second or subsequent violation shall be
punished by the next higher penalty classification than that prescribed
for a first violation of this subsection, but in no event shall such
person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB felony.
-6-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(6) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for violation of
subsection (4) or (5) of this section that the defendant did not know the
age of the person through whom the defendant violated such subsection.
(7) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to cocaine or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(8) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to base cocaine (crack) or any mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of base cocaine in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(9) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
respect to heroin or any mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of heroin in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(10) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
-7-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
respect to amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
isomers, or with respect to methamphetamine, its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of its isomers, in a quantity of:
(a) One hundred forty grams or more shall be guilty of a Class IB
felony;
(b) At least twenty-eight grams but less than one hundred forty
grams shall be guilty of a Class IC felony; or
(c) At least ten grams but less than twenty-eight grams shall be
guilty of a Class ID felony.
(11) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any Any
person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana weighing more than
one ounce but not more than one pound shall be guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor.
(12) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, any Any
person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana weighing more than
one pound shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(13) Except as provided in the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient
Protection Act or the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or section
28-1701, any person knowingly or intentionally possessing marijuana
weighing one ounce or less or any substance containing a quantifiable
amount of the substances, chemicals, or compounds described, defined, or
delineated in subdivision (c)(27) of Schedule I of section 28-405 shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of an infraction, receive a
citation, be fined three hundred dollars, and be assigned to attend a
course as prescribed in section 29-433 if the judge determines that
attending such course is in the best interest of the individual
defendant;
(b) For the second offense, be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor,
receive a citation, and be fined four hundred dollars and may be
-8-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
imprisoned not to exceed five days; and
(c) For the third and all subsequent offenses, be guilty of a Class
IIIA misdemeanor, receive a citation, be fined five hundred dollars, and
be imprisoned not to exceed seven days.
(14) Any person convicted of violating this section, if placed on
probation, shall, as a condition of probation, satisfactorily attend and
complete appropriate treatment and counseling on drug abuse provided by a
program authorized under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act or
other licensed drug treatment facility.
(15) Any person convicted of violating this section, if sentenced to
the Department of Correctional Services, shall attend appropriate
treatment and counseling on drug abuse.
(16) Any person knowingly or intentionally possessing a firearm
while in violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be punished by
the next higher penalty classification than the penalty prescribed in
subsection (2), (7), (8), (9), or (10) of this section, but in no event
shall such person be punished by a penalty greater than a Class IB
felony.
(17) A person knowingly or intentionally in possession of money used
or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of subsection (1) of
this section shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(18) In addition to the existing penalties available for a violation
of subsection (1) of this section, including any criminal attempt or
conspiracy to violate subsection (1) of this section, a sentencing court
may order that any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices as defined in section
28-833 or any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or
accessories related to electronic communication devices be forfeited as a
part of the sentence imposed if it finds by clear and convincing evidence
adduced at a separate hearing in the same prosecution, following
conviction for a violation of subsection (1) of this section, and
-9-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
conducted pursuant to section 28-1601, that any or all such property was
derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a violation of
subsection (1) of this section.
(19) In addition to the penalties provided in this section:
(a) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and has one or more licenses or
permits issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for thirty days and (B) require such person to attend a drug education
class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as a part of the judgment
of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses or permits
for ninety days and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than
twenty and no more than forty hours of community service and to attend a
drug education class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as a part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) impound any such licenses
or permits for twelve months and (B) require such person to complete no
fewer than sixty hours of community service, to attend a drug education
class, and to submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug
counselor; and
(b) If the person convicted or adjudicated of violating this section
is eighteen years of age or younger and does not have a permit or license
issued under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act:
(i) For the first offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until thirty days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to attend a drug education class;
(ii) For a second offense, the court may, as part of the judgment of
-10-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from obtaining any
permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such person would
otherwise be eligible until ninety days after the date of such order and
(B) require such person to complete no fewer than twenty hours and no
more than forty hours of community service and to attend a drug education
class; and
(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, the court may, as part of
the judgment of conviction or adjudication, (A) prohibit such person from
obtaining any permit or any license pursuant to the act for which such
person would otherwise be eligible until twelve months after the date of
such order and (B) require such person to complete no fewer than sixty
hours of community service, to attend a drug education class, and to
submit to a drug assessment by a licensed alcohol and drug counselor.
A copy of an abstract of the court's conviction or adjudication
shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to
sections 60-497.01 to 60-497.04 if a license or permit is impounded or a
juvenile is prohibited from obtaining a license or permit under this
subsection.
Sec. 3. Section 28-439, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-439 (1) As used in sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444,
unless the context otherwise requires, drug paraphernalia shall mean all
equipment, products, and materials of any kind which are used, intended
for use, or designed for use, in manufacturing, injecting, ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a controlled
substance in violation of sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444
or the Uniform Controlled Substances Act. It shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) (1) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride,
mannitol, mannite, dextrose, and lactose, used, intended for use, or
designed for use in cutting controlled substances;
-11-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(b) (2) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or
designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise
cleaning or refining, marijuana;
(c) (3) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used,
intended for use, and designed for use in parenterally injecting
controlled substances into the human body; and
(d) (4) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing marijuana, cocaine,
hashish, or hashish oil into the human body, which shall include but not
be limited to the following:
(i) (a) Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic
pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or
punctured metal bowls;
(ii) (b) Water pipes;
(iii) (c) Carburetion tubes and devices;
(iv) (d) Smoking and carburetion masks;
(v) (e) Roach clips, meaning objects used to hold burning material,
such as a marijuana cigarette, which has become too small or too short to
be held in the hand;
(vi) (f) Miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine vials;
(vii) (g) Chamber pipes;
(viii) (h) Carburetor pipes;
(ix) (i) Electric pipes;
(x) (j) Air-driven pipes;
(xi) (k) Chillums;
(xii) (l) Bongs; and
(xiii) (m) Ice pipes or chillers.
(2) This section does not apply to conduct involving cannabis
accessories as defined in section 1 of this act when such conduct is
lawful under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
-12-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Section 28-476, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-476 (1) No person shall carry or transport hemp in this state
unless such hemp is:
(a) Produced in compliance with the requirements of the Agriculture
Improvement Act of 2018, as such act is defined in section 2-503; and
(b) Carried or transported as provided in section 2-515.
(2)(a) A peace officer may detain any person carrying or
transporting hemp in this state if such person does not provide the
documentation required by this section and section 2-515. Unless the
peace officer has probable cause to believe the hemp is, or is being
carried or transported with, marijuana or any other controlled substance,
the peace officer shall immediately release the hemp and the person
carrying or transporting such hemp upon production of such documentation.
(b) The failure of a person detained as described in this subsection
to produce documentation required by this section shall constitute
probable cause to believe the hemp may be marijuana or another controlled
substance. In such case, a peace officer may collect such hemp for
testing to determine the delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in
the hemp, and, if the peace officer has probable cause to believe the
person detained is carrying or transporting marijuana or any other
controlled substance in violation of state or federal law, the peace
officer may seize and impound the hemp or marijuana or other controlled
substance and arrest such person.
(c) This subsection does not limit or restrict in any way the power
of a peace officer to enforce violations of the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act and federal law regulating marijuana and other controlled
substances.
(3) In addition to any other penalties provided by law, any person
who intentionally violates this section shall be guilty of a Class IV
misdemeanor and fined not more than one thousand dollars.
-13-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(4) This section does not apply to cannabis transported in
accordance with the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act or
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
Sec. 5. Section 53-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-105 There is hereby created the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission, consisting of three members to be appointed by the Governor,
subject to confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the
Legislature, no more than two of whom shall be members of the same
political party, and no two shall be citizens of the same congressional
district. The members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission shall
also serve as members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission as
provided in section 4, Initiative Law 2024, No. 438.
Sec. 6. Section 53-106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-106 The Governor shall appoint three members of the commission,
one of whom he shall designate as chairperson chairman. One member shall
be appointed every two years and shall hold office for a period of six
years. Any appointee may be removed by the Governor, after an opportunity
to be heard, for malfeasance, misfeasance, or neglect in office. No
person shall be appointed to the commission, or continue to hold that
office after appointment, while holding any other office or position
under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States,
except that the commissioners shall also serve as members of the Nebraska
Medical Cannabis Commission as provided in section 4, Initiative Law
2024, No. 438.
Sec. 7. Section 53-110, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-110 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cannabis has the same meaning as in section 1 of this act;
(b) Commission means the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission and the
-14-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission;
(c) Conviction includes a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction
following a plea of nolo contendere, payment of a fine or penalty in
settlement of any prosecution, or forfeiture of a bond to appear in court
to answer charges; and
(d) Covered offense means:
(i) A felony; or
(ii) A violation of any federal or state law concerning the
manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor or cannabis.
(2) (1) No person shall be appointed as a commissioner, the
executive director of the commission, or an employee of the commission
who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not resided within
the State of Nebraska successively for two years next preceding the date
of his or her appointment.
(3) (2) No person (a) convicted of a covered offense or who has
pleaded guilty to a felony or any violation of any federal or state law
concerning the manufacture or sale of alcoholic liquor prior or
subsequent to the passage of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, (b) who has
paid a fine or penalty in settlement of any prosecution against him or
her for any violation of such laws, or (c) who has forfeited his or her
bond to appear in court to answer charges for any such violation shall be
appointed commissioner.
(4)(a) (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of
this subsection, a no commissioner or employee of the commission shall
not may, directly or indirectly, individually, as a member of a
partnership, as a member of a limited liability company, or as a
shareholder of a corporation: , have
(i) Have any interest whatsoever in the manufacture, sale, or
distribution of alcoholic liquor or cannabis; ,
(ii) Receive receive any compensation or profit from such
manufacture, sale, or distribution; ,
-15-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
(iii) Have or have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales
made by the persons authorized by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act act to
purchase or to sell alcoholic liquor; or .
(iv) Have any interest whatsoever in the purchases or sales made by
the persons authorized by the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act or
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act to purchase or to
sell cannabis.
(b) With the written approval of the executive director, an employee
of the commission, other than the executive director or a division
manager, may accept part-time or seasonal employment with a person
licensed or regulated by the commission. No such employment shall be
approved if the licensee receives more than fifty percent of the
licensee's gross revenue from the sale or dispensing of alcoholic liquor
or cannabis.
(5) (4) This section shall not prevent any commissioner, the
executive director, or any employee from purchasing and keeping in his or
her possession for the use of himself, herself, or members of his or her
family or guests any:
(a) Alcoholic alcoholic liquor which may be purchased or kept by any
person pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act; or act.
(b) Cannabis which may be purchased or kept as allowed pursuant to
the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act.
Sec. 8. Section 53-111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-111 (1) A commissioner, the executive director of the commission,
or any person appointed or employed by the commission shall not solicit
or accept any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any person
subject to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act or the Nebraska Medical
Cannabis Regulation Act or from any officer, agent, or employee thereof
or solicit, request from, or recommend, directly or indirectly, to any
such person or to any officer, agent, or employee thereof the appointment
-16-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
of any person to any place or position. Any such person and every
officer, agent, or employee thereof may not offer to any commissioner,
the executive director, or any person appointed or employed by the
commission any gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment. If a
commissioner, the executive director, or any person appointed or employed
by the commission violates this section, he or she shall be removed from
his or her office or employment. Every person violating this section
shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
Sec. 9. Section 77-4303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-4303 (1) A tax is hereby imposed on marijuana and controlled
substances at the following rates:
(a) On each ounce of marijuana or each portion of an ounce, one
hundred dollars;
(b) On each gram or portion of a gram of a controlled substance that
is customarily sold by weight or volume, one hundred fifty dollars; or
(c) On each fifty dosage units or portion thereof of a controlled
substance that is not customarily sold by weight, five hundred dollars.
(2) For purposes of calculating the tax under this section,
marijuana or any controlled substance that is customarily sold by weight
or volume shall be measured by the weight of the substance in the
dealer's possession. The weight shall be the actual weight, if known, or
the estimated weight as determined by the Nebraska State Patrol or other
law enforcement agency. Such determination shall be presumed to be the
weight of such marijuana or controlled substances for purposes of
sections 77-4301 to 77-4316.
(3) The tax shall not be imposed upon a person registered or
otherwise lawfully in possession of marijuana or a controlled substance
pursuant to Chapter 28, article 4, or lawfully in possession of cannabis
under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act or the
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.
-17-

LB483 LB483
2025 2025
Sec. 10. Original sections 28-439, 53-105, 53-106, 53-110, 53-111,
and 77-4303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 28-416 and
28-476, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 2,
Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, are repealed.
Sec. 11. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
28-463, 28-464, 28-465, 28-466, 28-467, 28-468, and 28-469, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 12. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-18-